test/src/morphology/V-puegaemae76_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - pügämä: # Verb (76) pügämä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     pügämä+V+Inf/mA: pügämä
     pügämä+V+Inf: pükäq
     pügämä+V+ActPrtPrc: pügänüq
     pügämä+V+PssPrtPrc: pöet
     pügämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: püä
     pügämä+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: pügä
     pügämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: `pöi(e)
     pügämä+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: pügi
